Utah statutes.
63F-1-802.   Duties and powers.

(1)  The Statewide Communications Interoperability Committee shall:

(a)  promote wireless technology information and interoperability among local, state, federal, and other agencies;

(b)  provide a mechanism for coordinating and resolving wireless communication issues among local, state, federal, and other agencies;

(c)  coordinate statewide efforts for implementation of interoperable statewide voice and data networks;

(d)  improve data and information sharing and coordination of multi-jurisdictional responses;

(e)  leverage existing state resources and develop a network that will provide seamless, coordinated, and integrated communication for local, state, federal, and other agencies;

(f)  identify opportunities to consolidate infrastructures and technologies;

(g)  evaluate current technologies and determine if they are meeting the needs of agency personnel in respective service areas;

(h)  develop and recommend short- and long-term proposals for future communication needs;

(i)  form memorandums of understanding between agencies in support of proactive planning efforts;

(j)  create and maintain procedures for requesting interoperability channels; and

(k)  administer the interoperability spectrum.

(2) (a)  The committee shall prepare and present, by November 30 of each year, a brief annual report for the governor and the Public Utilities and Technology Interim Committee.

(b)  The annual report described in Subsection (2)(a) shall include:

(i)  the status of state radio communications infrastructure;

(ii)  recommendations to facilitate radio communications in the future; and

(iii)  an update on the committee's progress to meet the Federal Communications Commission radio communication requirements.

